Illinois, session 104th, HB4590.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 6205-455 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 205/205-455 new)8    Sec. 205-455. Illinois Down Payment Assistant Grant 9Program.10    (a) In this Section:11    "Eligible applicant" means a natural person who:12        (1) is a resident of Illinois;13        (2) demonstrates knowledge of the type of farming the 14    eligible applicant intends to do on the farm;15        (3) earns less than and is expected to earn less than 16    $250,000 annually in gross agricultural sales;17        (4) has never owned a farm and whose spouse has never 18    owned a farm;19        (5) is not applying for a grant under this Section or 20    rules adopted under this Section for the purchase of the 21    farm from a direct family member as defined in Section 22    267(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code;23        (6) will provide the majority of labor and management   HB4590- 2 -LRB104 17461 BDA 30887 b1    on the farm;2        (7) will commercially farm the land for at least 5 3    years;4        (8) is in good standing with the State of Illinois; 5    and6        (9) has not been convicted of a crime related to a 7    State grant agreement.8    "Eligible farm purchase" means a purchaser's first farm 9that is purchased within the borders of the State of Illinois 10and that is purchased within a designated timeframe, as 11determined by the Department. "Eligible farm purchase" 12includes farmland or other agricultural real estate, with 13tillable acres, a hog barn, a commercial greenhouse, or other 14similar agricultural real estate.15    "Priority applicant" means an eligible applicant who:16        (1) earns less than and is expected to earn less than 17    $100,000 annually in gross agricultural sales; or18        (2) produces or plans to produce one or more of the 19    following crops:20            (A) industrial hemp;21            (B) cannabis; or22            (C) fruits and vegetables, tree nuts, dried 23        fruits, and horticulture and nursery crops, including 24        floriculture, and other specialty crops as defined by 25        the Agricultural Marketing Service of the United 26        States Department of Agriculture.   HB4590- 3 -LRB104 17461 BDA 30887 b1        2    (b) For the purposes of helping emerging farmers buy their 3first farms, supporting farm succession, and increasing access 4to land for new farmers, the Department shall adopt rules 5establishing, implementing, and administering the Illinois 6Down Payment Assistant Grant Program under this Section. The 7Illinois Down Payment Assistant Grant Program shall offer up 8to $20,000 grants for eligible applicants purchasing their 9first farms that are eligible farm purchases. If more eligible 10applicants apply than grants are available, then the 11recipients shall be chosen with a random lottery process 12determined by the Department, with priority given to priority 13applicants.